Nebraska, session 109, LB505.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB505 LB505
2025 2025
Section 1. It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate
$10,000,000 for FY2025-26 and $10,000,000 for FY2026-27 from Federal
Funds to the Department of Health and Human Services, Program No. 347,
Public Assistance. There is included in the appropriation to the program
funds from the federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program
for grants to nonprofit organizations that (1) provide food assistance,
(2) distribute food in ten or more counties in Nebraska, and (3) qualify
for the Emergency Food Assistance Program administered by the United
States Department of Agriculture.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-